Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-813
Merger; no bar to subsequent constitution into another condominium property.

The merger provided for in section 76-812 shall in no way bar the subsequent constitution of the property into another condominium property regime whenever so desired and upon observance of the provisions of sections 76-801 to 76-823.

Laws 1963, c. 429, § 13, p. 1441.